test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AAY_gt-norm.yaml
     jadahlgwáay+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: jadahlgwáay
     jadahlgwáay+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáayga
     jadahlgwáay+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay
     jadahlgwáay+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáaygang
     jadahlgwáay+V+DIRECT+PAST: jadahlgwáaygan
     jadahlgwáay+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: jadahlgwáayaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+INDIRECT+PAST: jadahlgwáayaan
     jadahlgwáay+V+RELATIVE: jadahlgwáays
     jadahlgwáay+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: jadahlgwáayaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+NON_FACTIVE: jadahlgwáayang
     jadahlgwáay+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: jadahlgwáayaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáaygang
     jadahlgwáay+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáayganggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: jadahlgwáaygangang
     jadahlgwáay+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáaygiinii
     jadahlgwáay+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáaygaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáaygaangaan
     jadahlgwáay+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: jadahlgwáayäsaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: jadahlgwáayäs
     jadahlgwáay+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: jadahlgwáayäsaang
     jadahlgwáay+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: jadahlgwáayäsga
     jadahlgwáay+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: jadahlgwáayäsaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: jadahlgwáayäsaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: jadahlgwáayang k̲asa'áa
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEAR+FUTURE: jadahlgwáayang k̲asa'áang
     jadahlgwáay+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: jadahlgwáayang k̲asaasdláa
     jadahlgwáay+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: jadahlgwáayang k̲asaasdláang
     jadahlgwáay+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'uuj
     jadahlgwáay+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'uujang
     jadahlgwáay+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: jadahlgwáayäsaa'uujang
     jadahlgwáay+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'us
     jadahlgwáay+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: jadahlgwáay'ujaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'uujaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: jadahlgwáayäsaa'us
     jadahlgwáay+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'ahlanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+CERTAIN+PAST: jadahlgwáay'ahlanggan
     jadahlgwáay+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'ahlanggiinii
     jadahlgwáay+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: jadahlgwáayäsaa'ahlans
     jadahlgwáay+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: jadahlgwáay'ahlans
     jadahlgwáay+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: jadahlgwáaygaa'ahlang
     jadahlgwáay+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: jadahlgwáaygaa'ahlanggaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: jadahlgwáaygaa'ahlanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+REFLEXIVE: jadahlgwáay'ahl
     jadahlgwáay+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: jadahlgwáayäseehl
     jadahlgwáay+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: jadahlgwáay'uu
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'waa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'waa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'waang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: jadahlgwáay'wägan
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: jadahlgwáay'aawaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: jadahlgwáay'aawaan
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: jadahlgwáay'waas
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: jadahlgwáay'aawaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: jadahlgwáay'waa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: jadahlgwáay'aawaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáaygang'waa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáaygang'waang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: jadahlgwáaygang'waa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'wägiinii
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'wägaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'wägaangaan
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: jadahlgwáay'waaäsaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: jadahlgwáay'waaäs
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'waaäsaang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'waaäsga
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'waaäsaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: jadahlgwáay'waaäsaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'waa'uuj
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'waa'uujang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: jadahlgwáay'waaäsaa'uujang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'waa'us
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: jadahlgwáay'waa'ujaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'waa'uujaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'waaäsaa'us
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'waa'ahlanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: jadahlgwáay'waa'ahlanggan
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'waa'ahlanggiinii
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'waaäsaa'ahlans
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: jadahlgwáay'waa'ahlans
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: jadahlgwáay'aawaa'ahlang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: jadahlgwáay'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'aawaa'ahlanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: jadahlgwáay'waa'ahl
     jadahlgwáay+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: jadahlgwáay'waaäseehl
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: jadahlgwáay'ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'angga
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'anggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: jadahlgwáay'anggan
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: jadahlgwáay'aangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: jadahlgwáay'aangaan
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: jadahlgwáay'ans
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: jadahlgwáay'aangaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: jadahlgwáay'angang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: jadahlgwáay'aangaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'anggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáaygang'anggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: jadahlgwáaygang'angang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'anggiinii
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'anggaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'anggaangaan
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: jadahlgwáay'angäsaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: jadahlgwáay'angäs
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'angäsaang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'angäsga
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'angäsaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: jadahlgwáay'angäsaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: jadahlgwáayang k̲asaa'áng
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: jadahlgwáayang k̲asaa'ánggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: jadahlgwáayang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: jadahlgwáayang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'ang'uuj
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'ang'uujang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: jadahlgwáay'angäsaa'uujang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'ang'us
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: jadahlgwáay'ang'ujaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'ang'uujaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'angäsaa'us
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'aang'ahlanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: jadahlgwáay'aang'ahlanggan
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'aang'ahlanggiinii
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'angäsaa'ahlans
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: jadahlgwáay'aang'ahlans
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: jadahlgwáay'aangaa'ahlang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: jadahlgwáay'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'aangaa'ahlanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: jadahlgwáay'aang'ahl
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: jadahlgwáay'angäseehl
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: jadahlgwáay'ang'uu
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'ang'waa
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'ang'waa
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'ang'waang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: jadahlgwáay'ang'wägan
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: jadahlgwáay'ang'aawaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: jadahlgwáay'ang'aawaan
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: jadahlgwáay'ang'waas
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: jadahlgwáay'ang'aawaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: jadahlgwáay'ang'waa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: jadahlgwáay'ang'aawaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáaygang'ang'waa
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáaygang'ang'waang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: jadahlgwáaygang'ang'waa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'ang'wägiinii
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'ang'wägaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'ang'wägaangaan
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: jadahlgwáay'ang'waaäsaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: jadahlgwáay'ang'waaäs
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'ang'waaäsaang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'ang'waaäsga
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'ang'waaäsaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: jadahlgwáay'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'ang'waa'uuj
